Mississippi, session 2026, HB1516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In administering the Child Care Payment Program (CCPP), when the Department of Human Services provides notice to each recipient of child care tuition assistance from the program about the time for renewal of the application for assistance under the program, the department shall also provide notice about the time for renewal to the child care provider from which the recipient received child care services with the assistance provided by the program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.